Louisiana, session 2026, SB156.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:32(C)(1) and (2) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§32. Negligent homicide
* * *
C.(1)(a) Except as provided for in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, whoever
commits the crime of negligent homicide shall be imprisoned with or without hard
labor for not more than ten years, fined not more than five thousand dollars, or
imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not more than fifteen years, or both.
(b) If the court does not order the offender to a term of imprisonment
when the following two factors are established, the court shall state, both orally
and in writing at the time of sentencing, the reasons for not sentencing the
offender to a term of imprisonment:
(i) The fatality was caused by a person engaged in the operation of, or in
actual physical control of, any motor vehicle, aircraft, watercraft, or other
means of conveyance; and
(ii) The offender's blood alcohol concentration contributed to the fatality.
(2)(a) If the victim killed was under the age of ten thirteen years, the
offender shall be imprisoned at hard labor, without benefit of probation, parole, or
suspension of sentence, for not less than two years nor more than ten twenty years.
(b) If the court does not order the offender to a term of imprisonment when
the following two factors are established, the court shall state, both orally and in
writing at the time of sentencing, the reasons for not sentencing the offender to a
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 156 ENROLLED
term of imprisonment:
(i) The fatality was caused by a person engaged in the operation of, or in
actual physical control of, any motor vehicle, aircraft, watercraft, or other means of
conveyance; and
(ii) The offender's blood alcohol concentration contributed to the fatality.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.